Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1148.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5(h)(3.1) of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended to read:Section 5. Unlawful Discriminatory Practices.--It shall be an unlawful discriminatory practice, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification, or in the case of a fraternal corporation or association, unless based upon membership in such association or corporation, or except where based upon applicable security regulations established by the United States 12345678910111213141516171819202122 or the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania:* * *(h) For any person to:* * *(3.1) Refuse to permit, at the expense of a person with a handicap or disability, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord [may] shall, where it is reasonable to do so, make a modification at the landlord's expense or grant permission for a renter modification at the renter's request if the renter agrees to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed before the modification, with reasonable wear and tear excepted. In the case of a rental, the landlord shall extend the protections granted under this subsection to any existing renter who either is a person with a handicap or disability or becomes a person with a handicap or disability after the start date of the renter's term pursuant to the lease or rental agreement. A lease or rental agreement:(i) Shall permit the renter to terminate the lease or rental agreement with no additional fee, cost or penalties if the landlord refuses to make a reasonable accommodation under this subsection within thirty days or grant a renter's reasonable accommodation request under this subsection within ten days, as the case may be.(ii) Shall permit the renter to terminate the lease or rental agreement with no additional fee, cost or penalties if the renter's handicap or disability becomes more severe and the renter needs to move to a new residence that will help the 20260SB1148PN1388 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renter treat and manage a handicap or disability.(iii) May not waive any of the rights under this paragraph by a provision of a lease or rental agreement and the landlord may not charge any fee, service charge or additional rent to the renter for exercising the renter's right under this paragraph.* * *Section 2. The amendment of section 5(h)(3.1) of the act shall apply to a lease or rental agreement executed or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1148PN1388 - 3 - 12345678910